New Jersey, session 222, A2793.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the requirements for a petition of nomination established in R.S.19:13-4, each such petition filed with the Secretary of State, the county clerk or the municipal clerk, as may be appropriate, shall include a statement signed by the candidate that he or she: a.     has not been convicted of any criminal offense under the laws of this State or of any criminal offense under the laws of another state, territory, commonwealth or jurisdiction of the United States, or any country in the world, which would be a crime if committed in this State; or b.    has been so convicted, in which case, the candidate shall disclose on the statement the details of the offense, including the type and degree of offense, the individual or entity it involved, the date it occurred, the date of conviction for the offense and the time served, the fine paid and any other penalty imposed.  Such a candidate may, as an alternative, provide with the statement a copy of an official document that provides such information.  If the candidate has been convicted of more than one criminal offense, such information about each such offense shall be provided. If a petition of nomination contains the names of two or more candidates, a signed statement for each candidate shall be attached to the petition at the time of filing. 2.    In addition to the requirements for a petition of nomination established in R.S.19:23-7, each such petition filed with the Secretary of State, the county clerk or the municipal clerk, as may be appropriate, shall include a statement signed by the candidate that he or she: a.     has not been convicted of any criminal offense under the laws of this State or of any criminal offense under the laws of another state, territory, commonwealth or jurisdiction of the United States, or any country in the world, which would be a crime if committed in this State; or b.    has been so convicted, in which case, the candidate shall disclose on the statement the details of the offense, including the type and  degree of offense, the individual or entity it involved, the date it occurred, the date of conviction for the offense and the time served, the fine paid and any other penalty imposed, if applicable. Such a candidate may, as an alternative, provide with the statement a copy of an official document that provides such information.  If the candidate has been convicted of more than one criminal offense, such information about each such offense shall be provided. If a petition of nomination contains the names of two or more candidates, a signed statement for each candidate shall be attached to the petition at the time of filing. 3.    This act shall take effect on January 1 next following the date of enactment.